Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-310.01
Performing arts; special permit; fee.

When the Department of Labor finds it to be in the best interests of the child, the Department of Labor may issue a special permit waiving any requirement or restriction imposed on employment of a child pursuant to sections 48-302 to 48-313 for any child employed as a performer in the performing arts subject to such conditions as the Department of Labor deems necessary. For purposes of this section, performing arts means musical and theatrical presentations and productions, including motion picture, theatre, radio, and television productions. Before any such waiver is issued, the written consent of a parent or a person standing in loco parentis to the child is required. The Department of Labor may charge a fee established by rule and regulation of the Commissioner of Labor for each special permit issued pursuant to this section.

Laws 1995, LB 330, § 4.